Mississippi, session 2026, HB585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the City of Holly Springs, Mississippi, for the purpose of widening a segment of Old Highway 78 into a four-lane road for the Springs Industrial Park that will be located in Holly Springs, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $ 2,500,000.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.